Hawaii statutes.
[§373-21] Exemption of vocational
rehabilitation services. Providers of vocational rehabilitation services
for injured workers covered by approved worker compensation plans under section
386-25 shall not be considered employment agencies under this section; provided
that the providers confine their services to those specified under section
386-25 and do not hold themselves out to the public as employment agencies
under this chapter. [L 1985, c 135, §8]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next